Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2615
Optometrist; applicability of requirements.

After January 1, 2000, only an optometrist licensed in this state prior to April 30, 1987, may practice optometry without meeting the requirements and obtaining certification required by sections 38-2613 and 38-2614.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 75;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 887.